Alaska statutes. Title 46. Water, Air, Energy, and Environmental Conservation.
Article 9. Prohibited Acts, Penalties, and Damages.

Collateral references. —

61B Am. Jur. 2d, Pollution Control, §§ 80-89.

39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, §§ 151-153.

Liability insurance coverage for violations of antipollution laws. 87 ALR4th 444.

Sec. 46.03.710.
Pollution prohibited.

A person may not pollute or add to the pollution of the air, land, subsurface land, or water of the state.

History.

(§ 3 ch 120 SLA 1971)

Administrative Code. —

For ambient air quality management, see 18 AAC 50, art. 1.

For program administration, see 18 AAC 50, art. 2.

For statewide standards, see 18 AAC 70, art. 1.

For exceptions to statewide standards, see 18 AAC 70, art. 2.

For domestic wastewater treatment and disposal, see 18 AAC 72, art. 1.

For nondomestic wastewater, see 18 AAC 72, art. 5.

For nondomestic wastewater system plan review, see 18 AAC 72, art. 6.

For discharge reporting, cleanup, and disposal of oil and other hazardous substances, see 18 AAC 75, art. 3.

For corrective action for leaking underground storage tanks, see 18 AAC 78, art. 2.

For cleanup levels, see 18 AAC 78, art. 6.

For public water system review and approval requirements, see 18 AAC 80, art. 2.

For standards, monitoring, variances, and exemptions, see 18 AAC 80, art. 3.

For coliform bacteria requirements, see 18 AAC 80, art. 4.

For lead and copper requirements, see 18 AAC 80, art. 5.

For surface water treatment, see 18 AAC 80, art. 6.

For enhanced surface water treatment, see 18 AAC 80, art. 7.

For disinfection and disinfection by-products, see 18 AAC 80, art. 9.

For public notification requirements, see 18 AAC 80, art. 10.

For laboratory certification requirements, see 18 AAC 80, art. 11.

Sec. 46.03.715.
Sale and use of TBT-based antifouling paint.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person may not sell or use TBT-based marine antifouling paint or coating in the state, nor may a person sell, rent, or lease in the state, or import into the state, or use in state water, a vessel, fishing gear, or other item intended to be partially or completely submerged in water, if the vessel, gear, or item has been painted or treated with TBT-based marine antifouling paint or coating.

TBT-based marine antifouling paint or coating need not be removed from fishing gear, or from a vessel or other item that was painted or treated before December 1, 1987, but the vessel, gear, or item may not be repainted or retreated with TBT-based marine antifouling paint or coating. Fish culture or capture nets treated with TBT-based marine antifouling coating before December 1, 1987, may not be used in state water on or after December 1, 1992.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, slow-leaching TBT-based marine antifouling paint may be imported into and sold in the state. A slow-leaching TBT-based marine antifouling paint may be applied in the state only to aluminum vessel hulls and lower outboard drive units. Aluminum vessel hulls and lower outboard drive units to which a slow-leaching TBT-based marine antifouling paint has been applied may be imported into and sold, rented, leased, or used in the state.

If a vessel of the United States government, a foreign vessel in state water fewer than 90 consecutive days, or a vessel of 4,000 gross tons or more was painted or treated with a TBT-based marine antifouling paint or coating before January 1, 2001, the paint or coating need not be removed, but the vessel may not be repainted or retreated with a TBT-based marine antifouling paint or coating.

In this section

“slow-leaching TBT-based marine antifouling paint” means a TBT-based marine antifouling paint, but not a coating or other treatment, that has a measured release rate equal to or less than the maximum release rate established for qualified antifouling paints containing organotin by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency under 33 U.S.C. 2401 — 2410 (the Organotin Antifouling Paint Control Act of 1988);

“TBT-based marine antifouling paint or coating” means a paint, coating, or treatment that contains tributyltin, or a triorganotin compound used as a substitute for tributyltin, and that is intended to control fouling organisms in a fresh water or marine environment;

“vessel” means watercraft used or capable of being used as a means of transportation on water, including

aircraft equipped to land on water; and

barges.

History.

(§ 2 ch 67 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 36 SLA 1991; am § 1 ch 13 SLA 2000)

Sec. 46.03.720.
Public water system plan review requirement.

[Repealed, § 12 ch 136 SLA 2004.]

A person may not construct, extend, install, or operate a public water supply system, or any part of a public water supply system, until plans for it are submitted to the department for review and the department approves them in writing.

The department may waive the requirements of this section.

History.

(§ 3 ch 120 SLA 1971; am § 7 ch 220 SLA 1976; am § 12 ch 136 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For coverage of chapter, see 18 AAC 15, art. 1.

For permit procedures, see 18 AAC 15, art. 2.

For informal and fee review procedures, see 18 AAC 15, art. 5.

For administrative appeal proceedures, see 18 AAC 15, art. 6.

For statewide standards, see 18 AAC 70, art. 1.

For exceptions to statewide standards, see 18 AAC 70, art. 2.

For domestic wastewater treatment and disposal, see 18 AAC 72, art. 1.

For domestic wastewater system plan review, see 18 AAC 72, art. 2.

For certified installer program, see 18 AAC 72, art. 4.

For nondomestic wastewater system plan review, see 18 AAC 72, art. 6.

For construction grants, see 18 AAC 73.

For Alaska clean water fund, see 18 AAC 76, art. 1.

For Alaska drinking water fund, see 18 AAC 76, art. 2.

For public water system review and approval requirements, see 18 AAC 80, art. 2.

For standards, monitoring, variances, and exemptions, see 18 AAC 80, art. 3.

For coliform bacteria requirements, see 18 AAC 80, art. 4.

For lead and copper requirements, see 18 AAC 80, art. 5.

For surface water treatment, see 18 AAC 80, art. 6.

For enhanced surface water treatment, see 18 AAC 80, art. 7.

For disinfection and disinfection by-products, see 18 AAC 80, art. 9.

For public notification requirements, see 18 AAC 80, art. 10.

For laboratory certification requirements, see 18 AAC 80, art. 11.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The state has jurisdiction to require permits of government contractors discharging sewage from a federally-owned treatment plant.
June 28, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Department of Environmental Conservation’s regulations concerning on-site water wells and wastewater disposal systems are a legitimate exercise of the department’s police power though the department lacks authority to adjudicate among conflicting future uses of land. The department also has authority under this section to regulate the construction of all (private and public) water wells drawn from a public water source. Sept. 5, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 46.03.730.
Pesticides.

A person may not spray or apply, or cause to be sprayed or applied dichloro-diphenyl-trichloro-ethane (DDT), dieldrin, or other pesticide or broadcast chemical in a manner that may cause damage to or endanger the health, welfare, or property of another person, or in a manner that is likely to pollute the air, soil, or water of the state without prior authorization of the department.

History.

(§ 3 ch 120 SLA 1971)

Administrative Code. —

For coverage of chapter, see 18 AAC 15, art. 1.

For permit procedures, see 18 AAC 15, art. 2.

For informal and fee review procedures, see 18 AAC 15, art. 5.

For administrative appeal proceedures, see 18 AAC 15, art. 6.

For purpose, applicability, prohibitions, and discharge notification, see 18 AAC 90, art. 1.

For pesticide registration, see 18 AAC 90, art. 2.

For certification requirements, see 18 AAC 90, art. 3.

For recordkeeping requirements, see 18 AAC 90, art. 4.

For permit requirements, see 18 AAC 90, art. 5.

For pesticide handling requirements, see 18 AAC 90, art. 6.

For inspection and enforcement, see 18 AAC 90, art. 7.

For forestry vegetation management, see 18 AAC 90, art. 8.

Sec. 46.03.740.
Oil pollution.

A person may not discharge, cause to be discharged, or permit the discharge of petroleum, acid, coal or oil tar, lampblack, aniline, asphalt, bitumen, or a residuary product of petroleum, into, or upon the waters or land of the state except in quantities, and at times and locations or under circumstances and conditions as the department may by regulation permit or where permitted under art. IV of the International Convention for the Prevention of Pollution of the Sea by Oil, 1954, as amended.

History.

(§ 3 ch 120 SLA 1971)

Administrative Code. —

For oil pollution prevention requirements, see 18 AAC 75, art. 1.

For discharge reporting, cleanup, and disposal of oil and other hazardous substances, see 18 AAC 75, art. 3.

For oil discharge prevention and contingency plans and nontank vessel plans, see 18 AAC 75, art. 4.

For surface oiling, see 18 AAC 75, art. 7.

For oil discharge for scientific purposes, see 18 AAC 75, art. 8.

For corrective action for leaking underground storage tanks, see 18 AAC 78, art. 2.

For cleanup levels, see 18 AAC 78, art. 6.

Sec. 46.03.742.
Reckless operation of tank vessel.

A person commits the crime of reckless operation of a tank vessel when, by recklessly operating, navigating, or piloting a tank vessel, the person causes a release of a hazardous substance and the release causes serious physical injury to another person or damage to the property of another.

Reckless operation of a tank vessel is a class C felony.

In this section, “reckless” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 141 SLA 1990)

Cross references. —

For fines and penalties for felonies, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.125

.

Sec. 46.03.743.
Negligent operation of tank vessel.

A person commits the crime of negligent operation of a tank vessel when, by operating, navigating, or piloting a tank vessel with criminal negligence, the person creates an unjustifiable risk of a release of a hazardous substance or an unjustifiable risk of harm to a person or property.

Negligent operation of a tank vessel is a class A misdemeanor.

In this section, “criminal negligence” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 141 SLA 1990)

Cross references. —

For fines and penalties for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Sec. 46.03.744.
Definitions for AS 46.03.742 — 46.03.744.

In AS

46.03.742

—

46.03.744

,

“hazardous substance” has the meaning given in AS

46.03.826

;

“tank vessel” means

a vessel that is constructed or adapted to carry, or that carries, as a means of transportation by water, a hazardous substance in bulk as cargo or cargo residue;

the vessel that propels the tank vessel if the tank vessel is a barge or other vessel that is not self-propelled.

History.

(§ 1 ch 141 SLA 1990)

Sec. 46.03.745.
Hazardous substance release.

Except for a controlled release, the reporting of which is the subject of an agreement with the commissioner under AS

46.09.010(b)

, a person may not cause or permit the release of a hazardous substance as defined in AS

46.09.900

.

History.

(§ 8 ch 59 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For discharge reporting, cleanup, and disposal of oil and other hazardous substances, see 18 AAC 75, art. 3.

For oil discharge prevention and contingency plans and nontank vessel plans, see 18 AAC 75, art. 4.

For corrective action for leaking underground storage tanks, see 18 AAC 78, art. 2.

For cleanup levels, see 18 AAC 78, art. 6.

Sec. 46.03.750.
Ballast water discharge.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, a person may not cause or permit the discharge of ballast water from a cargo tank of a tank vessel into the waters of the state. A tank vessel may not take on petroleum or a petroleum product or by-product as cargo unless it arrives in ports in the state without having discharged ballast from cargo tanks into the waters of the state and the master of the vessel certifies that fact on forms provided by the department.

The master of a tank vessel may discharge ballast water from a cargo tank of a tank vessel if it is necessary for the safety of the tank vessel and no alternative action is feasible to ensure the safety of the tank vessel.

History.

(§ 3 ch 120 SLA 1971; am § 19 ch 220 SLA 1976; am § 3 ch 266 SLA 1976; am § 3 ch 116 SLA 1980)

Cross references. —

For discharge of ballast into navigable waters, see AS

30.50.020

.

Administrative Code. —

For oil discharge prevention and contingency plans and nontank vessel plans, see 18 AAC 75, art. 4.

Sec. 46.03.755.
Discharge reporting.

A person in charge of a facility, operation, or vessel, as soon as the person has knowledge of any discharge from the facility, operation, or vessel in violation of AS

46.03.740

or

46.03.750

, shall immediately notify the department of the discharge.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the department may enter into a written agreement with a person for the periodic reporting of minor discharges other than into the waters of the state.

History.

(§ 8 ch 220 SLA 1976; am § 4 ch 266 SLA 1976; am § 4 ch 116 SLA 1980)

Administrative Code. —

For discharge reporting, cleanup, and disposal of oil and other hazardous substances, see 18 AAC 75, art. 3.

For corrective action for leaking underground storage tanks, see 18 AAC 78, art. 2.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A purchaser of property who learns from the seller that the property has been contaminated by an underground storage tank leak has a duty to immediately report that fact to the Department of Environmental Conservation once he acquires the property. March 15, 1993, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 46.03.758.
Civil penalties for discharges of oil.

The legislature finds that

recent information discloses that the discharge of oil may cause significant short and long-term damage to the state’s environment; even minute quantities of oil released to the environment may cause high mortalities among larval and juvenile forms of important commercial species, may affect salmon migration patterns, and may otherwise degrade and diminish the renewable resources of the state;

the exact nature and extent of oil pollution can be neither documented with certainty nor precisely quantified on a spill-by-spill basis; however, in light of the magnitude of harm which may be caused by oil discharges, and the vital importance of commercial, sport, and subsistence fishing, tourism, and the state’s natural abundance and beauty to the economic future of the state and its quality of life, it is the judgment of the legislature that substantial civil penalties should be imposed for the discharge of oil in order to provide a meaningful incentive for the safe handling of oil and to insure that the public does not bear substantial losses from oil pollution for which, because of its subtle, long-term, or unquantifiable nature, compensation would not otherwise be received; and

the handling of oil in large quantities is a hazardous undertaking that poses a significant threat to the economy and environment of the state, which can be substantially reduced only by the taking of rigorous safety precautions involving considerable expense; conversely, persons handling oil in smaller amounts pose a correspondingly lower risk to the economy and environment of the state, and are capable of safe oil handling practices at correspondingly lower costs; in order to provide an incentive that is effective, but not punitive, it is necessary and appropriate that the assessment of civil penalties for discharges of small quantities of oil be left for case-by-case judicial determination, while ensuring, through the penalty provisions of this section, that the handling of oil in large quantities occurs in a manner that will not impair the renewable resources of the state.

No later than the 10th day after the convening of the Second Session of the Tenth Alaska Legislature, the department shall submit to the legislature regulations establishing the following schedule of fixed penalties for discharges of oil:

subject to (2) of this subsection, the penalties for the following categories of receiving environments may not exceed

$10 per gallon of oil which enters an anadromous stream or other freshwater environment with significant aquatic resources;

$2.50 per gallon of oil which enters an estuarine, intertidal or confined saltwater environment; and

$1 per gallon of oil which enters an unconfined saltwater environment, public land or freshwater environment without significant aquatic resources;

for discharges of oil that are caused by the gross negligence or intentional act of the discharger, or when the court finds that the discharger did not take reasonable measures to contain and clean up the discharged oil, the penalty shall be determined by multiplying the penalty established under (1) of this subsection by a factor of five.

Regulations adopted under (b) of this section shall become effective 60 days after submission to the legislature, unless disapproved by a special concurrent resolution introduced in either house, and concurred in by a majority of the members in joint session within 60 days of the submission of the regulations. The department may periodically revise regulations adopted under (b) of this section. Revised regulations shall be submitted to the legislature no later than 10 days after the convening of the appropriate regular session of the legislature, and are subject to disapproval as specified in this subsection.

The schedule shall vary according to the toxicity, degradability and dispersal characteristics of the oil. The schedule shall also vary according to the sensitivity and productivity of the receiving environment. Variations under this subsection may be by subcategories of receiving environments, specific receiving environments, or both. The maximum penalties established in (b) of this section shall apply to discharges in the most sensitive and productive of receiving environments within each category of receiving environment, and the penalty shall decrease for less productive or sensitive receiving environments.

If a discharge of oil in excess of 18,000 gallons not permitted under applicable state and federal law occurs within the territorial jurisdiction of the state, or into or upon the adjacent outer continental shelf of the state, the following persons, in addition to the person causing or permitting the discharge, are jointly and severally liable to the state, in a civil action, for the full amount of penalties established in the regulations adopted under this section:

if the discharge occurs from any commercial or industrial facility other than a vessel or offshore platform, the owner, lessee or permittee, and operator of the facility;

if the discharge occurs from a vessel,

the owner and operator of the vessel; and

the owner of the oil carried as cargo on the vessel at the time the vessel was loaded, if the loading occurred within the territorial jurisdiction of the state, or at a deep-water port or other offshore storage facility adjacent to the state; however, if the owner of the oil temporarily transfers ownership of the oil to another person, and the transfer has the purpose or effect of evading the vicarious liability imposed by this section, the transferor shall be considered the owner of the oil for the purposes of this subsection; and

if the discharge occurs from an offshore platform, the lessee or permittee of the tract or acreage upon which the platform is situated, and the operator of the platform.

The court shall deduct from the penalties for which the person charged is liable under (e) of this section that amount of oil which was removed from the environment as a result of a cleanup operation undertaken in conformity with applicable state and federal law, unless the oil was removed by an agency of state, local or federal government. The dispersal of oil through the use of chemical agents or other means is not considered removal for the purposes of this subsection. The court may estimate the amount of oil removed.

Except as provided in (f) and (j) of this section, the entire penalty specified in the regulations shall be imposed, except that a person who discharges oil into a receiving environment may demonstrate, by a preponderance of evidence, that mitigating circumstances relating to the effects of the discharge would make imposition of the full penalty inappropriate. In determining whether mitigating circumstances exist, the court shall recognize that scientific knowledge pertaining to oil spills is very limited and if there is insufficient knowledge either to predict a base case or to show mitigating circumstances varying from that base case, the administratively established schedule of penalties shall apply. If mitigating circumstances are proven by a preponderance of the evidence, the court may reduce or totally eliminate the penalty, in accordance with the purposes of this section.

A person otherwise liable for penalties under (e) of this section is not liable if the person demonstrates, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the discharge occurred solely as a result of

an act of God;

an act of a third person with intent to cause a discharge, unless the third person is a person with whom the person charged is made jointly and severally liable under (e)(1) — (3) of this section;

a negligent or intentional act of this state or the United States; or

an act of war.

Notwithstanding AS

46.03.875

, a person liable under this section is not also liable for the discharge of oil under AS

46.03.760(a)

. A person causing or permitting a discharge of oil of 18,000 gallons or less not permitted under applicable state or federal law is liable for that discharge under the penalty provisions of AS

46.03.760(a)

; however, the court may impose a penalty of less than $500 for the discharge.

The court may reduce the penalty imposed under this section if the person charged demonstrates, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the discharge was caused solely by a negligent act of a third person, unless the third person is a person with whom the person charged is made jointly and severally liable under (e)(1) — (3) of this section.

[Repealed, § 19 ch 59 SLA 1986.]

In this section,

“adjacent outer continental shelf” means that portion of the outer continental shelf that would be within the territorial jurisdiction of the state if its boundaries were extended seaward to the outer margin of the outer continental shelf;

“confined saltwater environment” means a bay, sound, or other partially enclosed saltwater body in which flushing through tidal or current action is significantly restricted;

“discharge of oil” means the entry of oil into or upon the water or public land of the state, except oil discharges into an enclosed and impervious oil spill containment area, regardless of causation;

“intertidal” means the ocean area between highest high water and lowest low water of tidal action;

“offshore platform” means an offshore structure, whether floating or temporarily or permanently secured to the floor of the ocean or other water body, which is used primarily for the exploration for or production of oil or natural gas;

“oil” means petroleum and any substance refined from petroleum, except crude oil;

“operator” means the person who, through contract, lease, sublease, or otherwise, exerts general supervision and control of activities at the facility; the term includes, by way of example and not limitation, a prime or general contractor, the master of a vessel and the master’s employer, or any other person who, personally or through an agent or contractor, undertakes the general functioning of the facility;

“vessel” means any form or manner of watercraft, whether or not capable of self-propulsion, except offshore platforms.

History.

(§ 1 ch 129 SLA 1977; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 128 SLA 1978; am § 110 ch 59 SLA 1982; am § 19 ch 59 SLA 1986; am §§ 1, 2 ch 41 SLA 1989)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1987, a reference in paragraph (b)(1) to “(3) of this subsection” was changed to “(2) of this subsection” to correct a manifest error.

Cross references. —

For provision that actions brought under this section may be brought directly against insurers or other persons providing evidence of financial responsibility, see AS

46.04.040(e)

; for schedule of civil penalties under (b) of this section, see 18 AAC 75.605 — 18 AAC 75.670.

Administrative Code. —

For civil penalties for discharge of petroleum and petroleum products and byproducts, see 18 AAC 75, art. 6.

Sec. 46.03.759.
Civil penalties for discharges of crude oil.

A person who is found to be liable under any other state law for an unpermitted discharge of crude oil in excess of 18,000 gallons is, in addition to liability for any other penalties or for damages or the cost of containment and cleanup, liable to the state in a civil action for a civil penalty, up to a maximum of $500,000,000, in the amount of

$8 per gallon of crude oil discharged for the first 420,000 gallons discharged; and

$12.50 per gallon of crude oil discharged for amounts discharged in excess of 420,000 gallons.

In determining how many gallons of crude oil have been discharged for purposes of assessing a penalty under (a) of this section, the court shall deduct the number of discharged gallons of crude oil that the defendant proves were removed by the defendant from the environment within the first 36 hours after the discharge as a result of a cleanup operation undertaken in conformity with applicable state and federal law. The dispersal of oil through burning, the use of chemical agents, biological additives, or sinking agents, or other means is not considered removal for the purposes of this subsection.

Subject to the $500,000,000 maximum set under (a) of this section the court shall assess four times the penalty set out in (a) of this section if the court finds

the discharge was caused by the gross negligence or intentional act of the defendant;

the defendant did not take reasonable measures to contain and clean up the discharged oil; or

the defendant did not act or respond in accordance with an approved oil discharge prevention and contingency plan.

Notwithstanding AS

46.03.875

, a person liable for civil penalties under this section is not also liable for the discharge of the crude oil under AS

46.03.760(a)

. A person causing or permitting a discharge of crude oil of 18,000 gallons or less not permitted under applicable state or federal law is liable for that discharge under the penalty provisions of AS

46.03.760(a)

; however, the court may impose a penalty of less than $500 for the discharge.

The court may reduce the penalty imposed under this section if the defendant demonstrates, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the discharge was caused solely by a negligent act of a third person unless the third person is a person with whom the defendant was found jointly and severally liable for the discharge under other state law.

A person otherwise liable for penalties under this section is not liable if the person demonstrates, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the discharge occurred solely as a result of

an act of God;

a negligent or intentional act of the State of Alaska or the United States; or

an act of war.

In this section, “discharge” means entry of crude oil into or upon the water or public land of the state, regardless of causation, except discharges into an enclosed and impervious oil spill containment area.

History.

(§ 3 ch 41 SLA 1989; am § 2 ch 191 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

The introductory language of (c) of this section was reorganized in 1989 to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes.

Sec. 46.03.760.
Civil action for pollution; damages.

A person who violates or causes or permits to be violated a provision of this chapter other than AS

46.03.250

—

46.03.313

, or a provision of AS 46.04 or AS 46.09, or a regulation, a lawful order of the department, or a permit, approval, or acceptance, or term or condition of a permit, approval, or acceptance issued under this chapter or AS 46.04 or AS 46.09 is liable, in a civil action, to the state for a sum to be assessed by the court of not less than $500 nor more than $100,000 for the initial violation, nor more than $5,000 for each day after that on which the violation continues, and that shall reflect, when applicable,

reasonable compensation in the nature of liquidated damages for any adverse environmental effects caused by the violation, which shall be determined by the court according to the toxicity, degradability, and dispersal characteristics of the substance discharged, the sensitivity of the receiving environment, and the degree to which the discharge degrades existing environmental quality;

reasonable costs incurred by the state in detection, investigation, and attempted correction of the violation;

the economic savings realized by the person in not complying with the requirement for which a violation is charged.

Except as determined by the court under (e)(4) of this section, actions under this section may not be used for punitive purposes, and sums assessed by the court must be compensatory and remedial in nature.

The court, upon motion of the department or upon its own motion, may defer assessment of all or part of that portion of the sum imposed upon a person under (a)(3) of this section conditioned upon the person complying, within the shortest feasible time, with the requirement for which a violation is shown.

In addition to liability under (a) — (c) of this section, a person who violates or causes or permits to be violated a provision of AS

46.03.740

—

46.03.750

is liable to the state, in a civil action brought under AS

46.03.822

, for the full amount of actual damages caused to the state by the violation, including

direct and indirect costs associated with the abatement, containment, or removal of the pollutant;

restoration of the environment to its former state;

amounts paid as grants under AS

29.60.510

—

29.60.599

and as emergency first response advances and reimbursements under AS

46.08.070(c)

; and

all incidental administrative costs.

A person who violates or causes or permits to be violated a provision of AS

46.03.250

—

46.03.313

,

46.03.460

—

46.03.475

, AS 46.14, or a regulation, a lawful order of the department, or a permit, approval, or acceptance, or term or condition of a permit, approval, or acceptance issued under AS

46.03.250

—

46.03.313

,

46.03.460

—

46.03.475

, AS 46.14, or under the program authorized by AS

46.03.020

(12), is liable, in a civil action, to the state for a sum to be assessed by the court of not less than $500 nor more than $100,000 for the initial violation, nor more than $10,000 for each day after that on which the violation continues, and that shall reflect, when applicable,

reasonable compensation in the nature of liquidated damages for any adverse environmental effects caused by the violation, that shall be determined by the court according to the toxicity, degradability and dispersal characteristics of the substance discharged, the sensitivity of the receiving environment, and the degree to which the discharge degrades existing environmental quality; for a violation relating to AS 46.14, the court, in making its determination under this paragraph, shall also consider the degree to which the discharge causes harm to persons or property; for a violation of AS

46.03.463

, the court, in making its determination under this paragraph, shall also consider the volume of the graywater, sewage, or other wastewater discharged; this paragraph may not be construed to limit the right of parties other than the state to recover for personal injuries or damage to their property;

reasonable costs incurred by the state in detection, investigation, and attempted correction of the violation;

the economic savings realized by the person in not complying with the requirement for which a violation is charged; and

the need for an enhanced civil penalty to deter future noncompliance.

An owner, agent, employee, or operator of a commercial passenger vessel, as defined in AS

43.52.295

, who falsifies a registration or report required by AS

46.03.460

or

46.03.475

or who violates or causes or permits to be violated a provision of AS

46.03.250

—

46.03.314

,

46.03.460

—

46.03.490

, AS 46.14, or a regulation, a lawful order of the department, or a permit, approval, or acceptance, or term or condition of a permit, approval, or acceptance issued under AS

46.03.250

—

46.03.314

, 46.03.460 —

46.03.490

, or AS 46.14 is liable, in a civil action, to the state for a sum to be assessed by the court of not less than $5,000 nor more than $100,000 for the initial violation, nor more than $10,000 for each day after that on which the violation continues, and that shall reflect, when applicable,

reasonable compensation in the nature of liquidated damages for any adverse environmental effects caused by the violation, that shall be determined by the court according to the toxicity, degradability, and dispersal characteristics of the substance discharged, the sensitivity of the receiving environment, and the degree to which the discharge degrades existing environmental quality; for a violation relating to AS 46.14, the court, in making its determination under this paragraph, shall also consider the degree to which the discharge causes harm to persons or property; this paragraph may not be construed to limit the right of parties other than the state to recover for personal injuries or damage to their property;

reasonable costs incurred by the state in detection, investigation, and attempted correction of the violation;

the economic savings realized by the person in not complying with the requirement for which a violation is charged; and

the need for an enhanced civil penalty to deter future noncompliance.

As used in this section, “economic savings” means that sum which a person would be required to expend for the planning, acquisition, siting, construction, installation and operation of facilities necessary to effect compliance with the standard violated.

History.

(§ 3 ch 120 SLA 1971; am § 9 ch 220 SLA 1976; am § 5 ch 266 SLA 1976; am §§ 5, 6 ch 116 SLA 1980; am §§ 5 — 7 ch 77 SLA 1984; am § 9 ch 59 SLA 1986; am § 8 ch 83 SLA 1991; am § 16 ch 74 SLA 1993; am § 3 ch 1 FSSLA 2001; am § 14 ch 20 SLA 2002; am § 8 ch 143 SLA 2004; am § 9, 2006 Primary Election Ballot Measure No. 2)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1995, former (d) of this section was relettered as (f); former subsections (e) and (f) were relettered as (d) and (e), respectively; “(e)(4)” was substituted for “(f)(4)” in subsection (b); and “(a)-(c)” was substituted for “(a)-(d)” in subsection (d).

In 2006, former subsection (f) was relettered as subsection (g) under an instruction given in § 9, 2006 Primary Election Ballot Measure No. 2.
In 2006, in subsection (f), “ AS

43.52.295

” was substituted for “ AS 43.52.095,” to reflect the 2006 renumbering of that section.
The reference to
AS

46.03.314

in subsection (f) appears because it was in sec. 9 of 2006 Primary Ballot Measure No. 2, despite the fact that
AS

46.03.314

was repealed in 1991.

Cross references. —

For oil pollution control, see AS 46.04; for provision that actions brought under (a) and (d) of this section may be brought directly against insurers or other persons providing evidence of financial security, see AS

46.04.040(e)

.

Administrative Code. —

For emissions inspection and maintenance requirements, see 18 AAC 52, art. 1.

For financial responsibility for oil discharges, see 18 AAC 75, art. 2.

For pesticide registration, see 18 AAC 90, art. 2.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 23, ch. 83, SLA 1991 provides that the amendment to subsection (e) made by § 8, ch. 83, SLA 1991 does “not apply to a release of oil or a hazardous substance and resultant cleanup activities or to efforts to respond to or abate that release if the release occurred before June 28, 1991.”

Section 11, 2006 Primary Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that made the 2006 addition of (f) of this section, provides that “[I]t is the intention of the people of Alaska that any portion of this legislation that is declared unlawful shall be stricken in a manner that preserves the remaining portion of the remaining legislation to the maximum extent possible.”